Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4407
Unfair trade and claims settlement practices laws; applicability.

Any risk retention group shall comply with and be subject to the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act and any rule or regulation issued under the act. Any risk retention group and its agents and representatives shall comply with and be subject to the Unfair Insurance Claims Settlement Practices Act and any rule or regulation issued under the act. If the director seeks an injunction regarding such conduct, the injunction shall be obtained from a court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 49;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 36.

Unfair Insurance Claims Settlement Practices Act, see section 44-1536.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.